Massachusetts, session 194th, H116.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 6C of chapter 20 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 3, the figure “18” and inserting in 
place thereof the following figure: - 19. 
SECTION 2. Said section 6C of said chapter 20, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting after the word “designee”, in line 14, the following words: - ; 1 of whom 
shall be the commissioner of fish and game, or the commissioner’s designee.